Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5716.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 19. (1) The department shall promulgate rules
establishing a procedure by which a premanufactured unit intended
for use in this state may be issued a certificate of acceptability
by the department at its place of manufacture.
(2) The procedure shall must require that the manufacturer
submit an application to the department with detailed plans and
specifications for the premanufactured unit for approval as in
compliance with the code. The manufacturer, in accordance with
subsection (5), may submit detailed plans and specifications that
GSS H05710'25 (H-1) tumopj


were reviewed by an independent entity approved by the commission
under rules promulgated by the department. The department may
require that the manufacturer submit test results on the
premanufactured unit or its components, any material or information
the department considers relevant, or 1 or more of the
premanufactured units for testing and evaluation by the department.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the
department shall approve or deny a manufacturer's application for a
certificate of acceptability under subsection (2) not later than 30
days after receipt of the application. If the department considers
the application to be incomplete, the department shall notify the
manufacturer in writing, or make information electronically
available, describing the deficiency and requesting the additional
information. The 30-day period to approve or deny the application
is tolled from the date the department notifies the manufacturer of
a deficiency until the date the requested information is received
by the department. If the department fails to approve or deny the
application within the 30-day period, the application is considered
to be approved, and the department shall issue a certificate of
acceptability to the manufacturer.
(4) (3) Each The department, or a qualified person approved by
the department, shall inspect each premanufactured unit shall be
inspected by the department, or a qualified person approved by the
department, to determine that if the premanufactured unit has been
was manufactured in accordance with plans and specifications
submitted under subsection (2). The department may issue a
certificate of acceptability for a premanufactured unit that bears
the approved label of an independent, nationally recognized body
having follow-up inspection service satisfactory to the commission,
GSS H05710'25 (H-1) tumopj


certifying that the premanufactured unit complies with plans and
specifications submitted under subsection (2).
(5) (4) Plans and specifications for 1- and 2-family dwelling
premanufactured units may be reviewed by the department or by an
independent entity approved by the commission under rules
promulgated by the department. The Subject to subsection (3), the
department shall establish submission procedures for plans and
specifications that were reviewed by an independent entity approved
by the commission under subsection (2).
(6) (5) A local enforcing agency may also inspect a
premanufactured unit at its place of manufacture to determine that
it has been if the premanufactured unit was manufactured in
accordance with plans and specifications submitted under subsection
(2). and The local enforcing agency shall advise the state
inspector and the commission in writing of any deviations found.
(7) (6) An approved independent entity shall not conduct in-
plant inspections of units for which it performed plan reviews.
However, the manufacturer may request a variance from the
commission if the literal application of the requirements of this
section would result in an exceptional, practical difficulty
relating to inspection of specific units. For purposes of As used
in this subsection, "exceptional, practical difficulty" includes,
but is not limited to, a geographic distance between the
manufacturing facility where the premanufactured units are
manufactured and the primary business location of the independent
entity that conducts in-plant inspections on behalf of the
manufacturer of more than 250 miles and is located in another
state.
(8) (7) If an application for a building permit specifying use
GSS H05710'25 (H-1) tumopj


of a premanufactured unit with a certificate of acceptability is
submitted to an enforcing agency, and if the application, except
for the part calling for use of a premanufactured unit with a
certificate of acceptability, complies with applicable construction
regulations, zoning laws, and local ordinances, the enforcing
agency shall issue the building permit within the time specified in
this act.
(9) (8) At the time of installation, a premanufactured unit
with a certificate of acceptability is subject only to the
nondestructive tests approved by the department necessary to
determine that it has not been damaged in transit or installation,
and that it has been installed in accordance with the building
permit and construction regulations.
(10) (9) The fees established for a building permit when the
application specifies use of a premanufactured unit with a
certificate of acceptability, or for inspection of the installation
of the premanufactured unit, shall must bear a reasonable relation
to the costs incurred by the enforcing agency in issuing a permit
or performing an inspection.
(11) (10) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section,
an enforcing agency may object to use of a premanufactured unit
with a certificate of acceptability on the basis that because the
premanufactured unit does not comply with the code. If an enforcing
agency on receipt of an application for a building permit
specifying the use of a premanufactured unit does object, objects
to use of the premanufactured unit, it may set forth its objections
in writing to the department before issuance of a building permit
and within not later than 10 business days after receipt of the
application. Within Not later than 10 business days after receipt
GSS H05710'25 (H-1) tumopj


of the objections, the commission, or a panel of 3 or more members
designated for that purpose by its chairman, chairperson, shall
hold a hearing on the objections in accordance with rules
promulgated by the department. After the hearing, the commission,
or its panel, within not later than 3 business days after the
hearing shall determine 1 of the following:
(a) The premanufactured unit does not comply with the code and
order that the certificate of acceptability be voided.
(b) The premanufactured unit requires additional testing and
evaluation in which case the testing and evaluation shall must be
conducted in accordance with this section.
(c) The objections are not valid and order the enforcing
agency to issue the building permit within not later than 3
business days after the order.
(12) (11) A certificate of acceptability issued by the
department shall must not be used for advertising purposes.
Final Page
GSS H05710'25 (H-1) tumopj